Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 4

Prohibitions and Enforcement

45-13-401. Prohibited acts and practices.

It is a violation of this chapter for any person subject to this chapter to:

Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device or artifice to defraud or mislead borrowers or lenders or to defraud any person;

Solicit or enter into a contract with a borrower that provides in substance that the person subject to this chapter may earn a fee or commission through best efforts to obtain a residential mortgage loan even though no loan is actually obtained for the borrower;

Solicit, advertise or enter into a contract for specific interest rates, points or other financing terms, unless the terms are actually available at the time of soliciting, advertising or contracting;

Conduct any business covered by this chapter without holding a valid license as required under this chapter or assist or aide and abet any person in the conduct of business under this chapter without a valid license as required under this chapter;

Fail to comply with this chapter or any rules or regulations promulgated under this chapter;

Contract for or collect interest on a residential mortgage loan, or both, at a rate in violation of the maximum effective rate of interest applicable to the contract, as established pursuant to title 47, chapter 14 or 15, as applicable, unless otherwise authorized by law to do so;

Fail to comply with any other state or federal law, or rules or regulations promulgated under any state or federal law, applicable to any business authorized or conducted under this chapter, including, but not limited to, the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act (12 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.), the Truth In Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq.), and the Equal Credit Opportunity Act (15 U.S.C. §§ 1691-1691f);

Make, in any manner, any false or deceptive statement or representation to a borrower or potential borrower, including, but not limited to, a false or deceptive statement or representation with regard to the rates, points or other financing terms or conditions for a residential mortgage loan, or engage in bait and switch advertising;

Make any false statement or material omission in connection with any information reported to or filed with the commissioner or with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or in connection with any examination or investigation conducted by the commissioner;

Fail to accurately account for moneys belonging to a party to a residential mortgage loan transaction;

Fail to disburse funds in accordance with a written agreement;

Obtain any agreement or instrument in which blanks are left to be filled in after execution;

Delay closing of any residential mortgage loan for the purpose of increasing interest, costs, fees or charges payable by the borrower;

Intimidate a real estate appraiser or influence an appraiser's report relating to market conditions or determination of value;

Refuse to permit the commissioner to make an examination authorized under this chapter; or

Assign or attempt to assign any license issued under this chapter.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

Attorney General Opinions. An individual investment property owner who provides a purchaser with financing that qualifies as a “residential mortgage loan” must be licensed under T.C.A. §§45-13-201, et seq., unless a statutory exception applies. Additionally, such an individual who provides such financing for compensation or gain or in the expectation thereof must be licensed under T.C.A. §§45-13-301, et seq., unless a statutory exception applies. OAG 10-93, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 99 (8/24/10).

45-13-402. False or misleading advertising unlawful — Exceptions.

It is unlawful for any person to place or cause to be placed any false or misleading advertising matter pertaining to mortgage loans or the availability of mortgage loans; provided, that this section shall not apply to the owner, publisher, operator or employees of any publication or radio or television station that disseminates the advertising matter.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-403. Payments to contractor from proceeds of mortgage loan for home improvement.

A licensed mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker shall not make any payments to a contractor or home improvement contractor from proceeds of a mortgage loan for home improvement other than:

In the form of an instrument that is payable to the borrower or jointly to the borrower and the contractor or home improvement contractor; or

At the election of the borrower by a third-party escrow agent in accordance with terms established in a written agreement signed by the borrower, the licensee and the contractor or home improvement contractor prior to the date of payment.

A licensed mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker shall not permit a contractor or home improvement contractor to be a cosigner or to act as a guarantor for a mortgage loan for home improvement.

As used in this section, “mortgage loan for home improvement” means a consumer credit mortgage loan transaction involving property located within this state regardless of the amount of the loan.

The commissioner is authorized to impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation of this section after notice and opportunity for a hearing.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-404. Investigation and examinations.

In addition to any authority allowed the commissioner elsewhere, the commissioner shall have the authority to conduct investigations and examinations of persons subject to this chapter, including those suspected to be engaging in business subject to this chapter, as often as necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter. In order to carry out the purposes of this section, the commissioner may:

Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials or regulatory associations in order to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing resources, standardized or uniform methods or procedures and documents, records, information or evidence obtained under this section;

Use, hire, contract or employ public or privately available analytical systems, methods or software to examine or investigate persons subject to this chapter;

Accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by other government officials, within or without this state; and

Accept audit reports made by independent certified public accountants for the person subject to this chapter in the course of that part of the examination covering the same general subject matter as the audit and incorporate the audit report in the report of examination, report of investigation or other writing of the commissioner.

For purposes of initial licensing, renewal, suspension or revocation, or for general or specific inquiry relative to any other investigation or examination, the commissioner shall have the authority to access, receive, review and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, information or evidence, including, but not limited to, the following:

Criminal, civil and administrative history information;

Personal history and experience information including independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in § 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. § 1681a(p)); and

Any other documents, information or evidence the commissioner deems relevant to the inquiry or investigation, regardless of the location, possession, control or custody of the documents, information or evidence.

To carry out an investigation or examination, the commissioner may issue subpoenas, administer oaths, compel attendance, examine under oath all persons whose testimony may be relevant and compel the production of any relevant records, books, papers, contracts, accounts, files or other documents. This power shall include the authority to interview the officers, principals, loan originators, employees, independent contractors, agents and customers of the subject of the investigation or examination concerning the business of the licensee or other person subject to this chapter.

Each person subject to investigation or examination shall make available to the commissioner upon request the books and records relating to the operations of the person and shall permit the commissioner to have access to the person's offices and places of business. In addition, the person shall make or compile reports or prepare other information as directed by the commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this section, including, but not limited to:

Accounting compilations;

Information lists and data concerning loan transactions in a format prescribed by the commissioner; or

Other information deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

If any person fails to comply with a subpoena of the commissioner under this chapter or to testify concerning any matter about which the person may be interrogated under this chapter, the commissioner may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for enforcement and may additionally suspend any license issued to the person pending compliance with the subpoena.

A mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker, mortgage loan servicer or registrant that is investigated or examined under this section from July 1, 2015, through December 31, 2015, shall pay to the commissioner the reasonable and actual expenses of the investigation or examination. After December 31, 2015, the costs for an examination or investigation of licensees or registrants shall be assessed pursuant to § 45-1-118(i). An unlicensed person subject to the licensing requirements of this chapter, that is examined or investigated in accordance with this chapter, shall pay to the commissioner the reasonable and actual expenses of the investigation or examination.

Any person aggrieved by the conduct of a person subject to this chapter in connection with a residential mortgage loan or in connection with any other activities of a mortgage lender, mortgage loan servicer or mortgage loan broker may file a written complaint with the commissioner, who is authorized to investigate the complaint.

The commissioner has exclusive administrative power to investigate and enforce any and all complaints filed by any person that are not criminal in nature, which complaints relate to mortgage lenders, mortgage loan brokers, mortgage servicers or mortgage loan originators.

No person subject to investigation or examination under this section may knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy or secrete any books, records, computer records or other information that the commissioner may lawfully examine or investigate.

The authority of this section shall remain in effect whether the person subject to investigation or examination acts or claims to act under any licensing or registration law or claims to act without such authority.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8; 2012, ch. 729, § 1; 2014, ch. 736, §§ 11, 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-405. Violations — Cease and desist orders — Penalties.

If, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, the commissioner finds that a person has violated this chapter or any administrative rule issued pursuant to this chapter, the commissioner may take any or all of the following actions:

Order the person to cease and desist violating this chapter or any administrative rule issued pursuant to this chapter;

Require the refund of any interest, fees or charges collected by the person in violation of this chapter or any administrative rule issued pursuant to this chapter;

Order the person to pay the commissioner a civil monetary penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation of this chapter or administrative rule issued pursuant to this chapter; or

Suspend or revoke any license issued under this chapter.

For any violation of this chapter, the commissioner may deny an application for licensure or refuse to renew a license issued under this chapter. The commissioner may also, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, suspend or revoke any license issued under this chapter for failure to maintain the requirements for licensure.

When a licensee is accused of any act, omission or misconduct that would subject the licensee to disciplinary action, the licensee, with the consent and approval of the commissioner, may surrender the license and all the rights and privileges pertaining to it for a period of time established by the commissioner. A person who surrenders a license shall not be eligible for or submit any application for a license under this chapter for a period of time established by the commissioner.

A licensee is subject to disciplinary action if any officer, director, person owning twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the licensee's outstanding capital, member, partner, managing principal, branch manager, mortgage loan originator, employee or any other person who acts on behalf of the licensee violates this chapter.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-406. Consent orders.

The commissioner may enter into consent orders at any time with any person to resolve any matter arising under this chapter. A consent order shall be signed by the person to whom it is issued, or a duly authorized representative, and shall indicate agreement to the terms contained in the consent order. A consent order need not constitute an admission by any person that this chapter or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued under this chapter has been violated, nor need it constitute a finding by the commissioner that the person has violated this chapter or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued under this chapter.

Notwithstanding the issuance of a consent order, the commissioner may seek civil or criminal penalties or compromise civil penalties concerning matters encompassed by the consent order.

In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the commissioner may take any enforcement action authorized by this chapter by issuing a temporary emergency order without providing the opportunity for a prior hearing. In such cases, the commissioner shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon an application to rescind the emergency order that is filed with the commissioner within twenty (20) days after receipt of the notice of the commissioner's emergency action. If no such appeal is timely filed, the temporary emergency order of the commissioner shall become final.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-407. Censure, suspension, or bar from industry.

If the criminal, civil or administrative judgment involved any offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions or duties of a person engaged in the business in accordance with this chapter, the commissioner, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may censure, suspend or bar a person from any position of management, control, employment or providing services for any licensee, registrant or other person subject to the commissioner's jurisdiction, if the commissioner finds that:

The censure, suspension or bar is in the public interest and that the person has committed or caused a violation of this chapter or any rule, regulation or order of the commissioner; or

The person has been:

Convicted of or pled guilty to or pled nolo contendere to any crime; or

Held liable in any civil action by final judgment or any administrative judgment by any public agency.

Persons suspended or barred under this section are prohibited from participating in any business activity of a registrant or licensee and from engaging in any business activity on the premises where a registrant or licensee is conducting its business. This subsection (b) shall not be construed to prohibit suspended or barred persons from having their personal transactions processed by a registrant or licensee.

This section shall apply to any violation, conviction, plea or judgment after July 1, 2001.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.